HunSpellDictionaries/uk_UA.dic
абсорбований/VZ
автентифікований/VZ
авторизований/VZ
агресивніший/VY
адитивний/VZ
аерований/VZ
активований/VZ
актуальніший/VY
акуратність/lmZ
амбітніший/VY
анігілювати/ABGHOP
анотований/VZ
аристотелів/UZ
ароматніший/VY
багатіти/IQG
багатослівний/VWZ
бадьоріший/VY
балакучість/lmZ
банальніший/VY
безболісніший/VY
бездоганніший/VY
безпечний/VWZ
безпечніший/VY
бідніший/VY
білковий/VZ
більший/VY
ближчий/VY
божевільніший/VY
брудніший/VY
бувалий/VZ
бути/AO
важливіший/VY
вборонити/ABX
вбраний/VWX
вважати/IJGHQR
ввібравши/X
ввідний/VX
ввічливість/lmZ
вгав/eX
вгадно/X
вгадувати/AGBHX
вгашати/IX
вгаювати/AX
вгаяний/VX
вглядання/iX
вгніватися/JX
вгніжджуватися/BX
вгніздитися/BX
вгоріти/AX
вгризений/VX
вгризнути/AX
вгризти/ABX
вгрібання/iX
вгрібати/IJX
вгрівання/iX
вгрузання/iX
вдавлений/VX
вдавленість/lX
вдавлення/iX
вдавлювання/iX
вдалину/X
вданий/VX
вданість/lX
вдарений/VX
вдвадцяте/X
вдвадцятьох/X
вдержаний/VX
вдесяте/X
вдіювання/iX
вдовиний/VX
вдовин/X
вдовицький/VX
вдовиця/abX
вдовичий/VX
вдовичин/eX
вдовіти/IX
вдовування/iX
вдовувати/AX
вдосконалювання/iX
вдочеряти/IX
вдячність/lmZ
веселіший/VY
вжалений/VX
вжинатися/JX
вжиття/iZ
взгір'я/ijX
вигадливий/VWZ
видимість/lmZ
видніший/VY
виконання/ijZ
викривляти/IJGHQR
вимірність/lmZ
винність/lmZ
випливати/IGQ
виплигати/IGQ
виплутувати/ABGHOP
виповзати/IGQ
виповідати/IGQ
випозичати/IGQ
виполювати/ABGHOP
виправлений/VZ
випромінювати/ABGHOP
випрямляти/IJGHQR
виразніший/VY
висловлений/VZ
вичерпний/VWZ
вишуканіший/VY
відісланий/VZ
відкритіший/VY
відповідальність/lmZ
відтворюваність/lZ
відчайдушніший/VY
вірний/VWZ
вкіс/aX
вклеєний/VWX
вкопаний/VWX
вкорінитися/BX
вкорінювати/ABX
вкотре/X
вкрадений/VWX
вкраїнський/VX
вкривало/ijX
влагодити/ABCDX
власний/VZ
влещений/VWX
влупити/AX
влучніший/VY
влягти/ABX
вмивання/iX
вмілий/VWX
вмотивований/VWX
вмочений/VWX
внадливий/VX
внести/IJX
внутрішній/VWX
водний/VZ
впевненіший/VX
впень/X
впереміж/X
вперемішку/X
впереміш/X
вперізувати/ABX
впечений/VWX
вписаний/VWX
впівсили/X
впізнаваність/lX
впійманий/VWX
впірнання/iX
впірнати/IX
вплетений/VWX
впливовіший/VY
вплутаний/VWX
вповні/X
вподоба/aX
вполовину/X
вправність/lmZ
вправоруч/X
вприкуску/X
впростяж/X
впхнутий/VWX
вранішній/VX
врівноважування/iX
врізнобіч/X
вродини/oX
вродити/ABX
врожайний/VZ
врозкидку/X
вроїти/ABX
вручну/X
вряджати/IJX
врядити/ABX
вряд/X
всадити/AX
всевладний/VX
вселити/ABEFX
всесвіт/efX
все-таки/X
всипище/iX
всисний/VX
всмерть/X
всотувати/ABX
вспід/X
встромлений/VWX
встругнути/AX
встрявання/iX
встрявати/AX
встрянути/AX
встряти/AX
всукати/AIX
всукувати/AX
всуціль/X
втаємничення/iX
втерпіти/AX
втерти/ABX
втискувати/ABX
втікач/efgX
втнути/AX
втомлювати/ABGHX
втопленик/efgX
вторований/VX
втручати/IJGHX
втрясати/IJGHQRX
вужчий/VY
входини/oX
вчасність/lZ
вчвал/X
гарніший/VY
гашений/VZ
гетьманувати/AO
гіркіший/VY
глухіший/VY
гнучкий/VZ
гойдати/IJGHQR
голосніший/VY
горючість/lmZ
грізніший/VY
гуманний/VZ
гуманніший/VY
давніший/VY
далекоглядний/VWZ
демократичний/VZ
демократичніший/VY
депонувати/ABGHOP
дешевший/VY
димніший/VY
дитячий/VZ
діловий/VZ
діставати/ABGHOP
добірніший/VY
доброякісність/lZ
довговічніший/VY
довгочасність/lZ
довір'я/iZ
доглядати/IJGHQR
догризений/VZ
доконаний/VZ
доношений/VZ
допущення/ijZ
доречніший/VY
дорослішати/IGQ
досконаліший/VY
досліджений/VZ
досяжний/VZ
дохідливіший/VY
драматичніший/VY
дружність/lZ
дурніший/VY
еволюціонувати/AGO
еволюціювати/AGO
економічність/lmZ
екстравагантніший/VY
елементарніший/VY
ефектніший/VY
жвавіший/VY
живий/VZ
жорстокіший/VY
заангажований/VZ
завидний/VZ
загрозливіший/VY
зайвий/VZ
закомпостований/VZ
залежність/lmZ
заперечність/lmZ
запозичувати/AO
заприбуткований/VZ
заражати/IJGHQR
заселеність/lZ
засмагати/IQ
затискати/IJGHQ
затишніший/VY
затягувати/ABGHOP
захищений/VZ
зациклювати/ABOP
збалансований/VZ
збурювати/ABGHOP
звичайний/VWZ
зв'язний/VZ
зграбність/lmZ
здавати/ABGHOP
здешевлювати/ABOP
здібніший/VY
здогадливий/VZ
злагідний/VZ
злиденніший/VY
злопам'ятність/lmZ
знання/ijZ
зневаджувати/ABOPW
зраджувати/ABGHOP
зрозумілість/lmZ
зручніший/VY
зумовлювати/ABGHOP
з'ясований/VZ
ізолювати/ABOP
інтегрувати/ABGHOP
інтенсивніший/VY
інфекційний/VZ
капіталістичний/VZ
касовіший/VY
каталогізувати/ABGHOP
керованість/lmZ
колоритніший/VY
компенсований/VZ
кондиційність/lZ
конкретніший/VY
консультувати/ABGHOP
контрольований/VZW
коректніший/VY
користолюбний/VZ
коштовніший/VY
креативніший/VY
крутіший/VY
культурний/VWZ
ласкавіший/VY
легальність/lmZ
ліквідовувати/ABGHOP
лікувати/ABGHOP
лінивіший/VY
лінійність/lZ
лояльніший/VY
любий/VWZ
людяність/lZ
мальовничіший/VY
маргіналізувати/ABOP
маркувати/ABGHOP
марний/VWZ
маскувати/ABOP
меншенький/VY
метушливий/VZ
милостивий/VWZ
мізерніший/VY
мобільніший/VY
можливий/VWZ
моторошніший/VY
музичний/VZ
м'якший/VY
навідувати/ABOP
навіювати/ABOP
надихати/IGQR
накидати/IJGHQR
налаштовувати/ABGHOP
написаний/VZ
наполегливіший/VY
наражати/IJGHQR
нарізати/IQ
натикати/IJGHQR
нахабніший/VY
незахищеніший/VY
несподіваніший/YV
ніжніший/VY
нульовий/VZ
об'єднувати/ABGHOP
обережніший/VY
обмежений/VWZ
обрізати/IJQR
огидніший/VY
однозначність/lmZ
ознайомлювати/ABOP
описувати/ABGHOP
оплатний/VZ
оприлюднювати/ABGHOP
оптимістичніший/VY
освітлювати/ABGHOP
освічений/VZ
освіченіший/YV
оселяти/IJQR
оцифровувати/ABGHOP
очищений/VZ
очищувати/ABOP
очікуваніший/VY
паскудніший/VY
перебирати/IJGHQR
перевірений/VZ
перевстановлювати/ABOP
перез'єднувати/ABOP
перекачувати/ABOP
переконливіший/VY
переповідати/IJGHQR
пильніший/VY
письменність/lmZ
під'єднувати/ABGHOP
підживлювати/ABGHOP
підігравати/AGO
підіймати/IJGHQR
підліковувати/ABOP
підліший/VY
підписаний/VZ
підпорядковувати/ABGHOP
підсилювати/ABGHOP
під'юджувати/AGO
плюсувати/ABGHOP
поважний/VZ
поважніший/VY
пов'язаний/VZ
податливіший/VY
подвоювати/ABGHOP
позбувати/IJQR
позначений/VZ
політизувати/ABOP
помітніший/VY
помічений/VZ
популяризувати/ABOP
послідовний/VWZ
потворніший/VY
почесніший/VY
поширювати/ABGHOP
правдами/Z
прагматичніший/VY
практичність/lZ
прекрасніший/VY
привітніший/VY
приготований/VZ
прийнятніший/VY
примітніший/VY
прирівнювати/ABOP
прискіпливіший/VY
пристойність/lmZ
пристосовувати/ABOP
пробивний/VZ
проблематичніший/VY
прогнозувати/ABGHOP
прозаїчніший/VY
прописаний/VZ
прослуховувати/ABOP
противніший/VY
протидіяти/IGQ
радісніший/VY
раціональність/lmZ
реалістичніший/VY
резонувати/ABGHOP
результативніший/VY
рентабельність/lmZ
рівномірніший/VY
рівноцінний/VZ
різноманітніший/VY
розважливість/lmZ
розглядати/IJGHQR
роздільність/lZ
роздмухувати/ABOP
розкішніший/VY
розкладати/IJGHQR
розмінювати/ABOP
розплачуватися/BHP
розривність/lmZ
розумніший/VY
розширювати/ABGHOP
рухомий/VZ
свідоміший/VY
святіший/VY
сильний/VWZ
сильніший/VY
скандальніший/VY
скупіший/VY
слугувати/AGO
службовий/VZ
слухняніший/VY
соковитіший/VY
соціальніший/VY
спалений/VZ
спеціалізувати/ABGHOP
справджений/VZ
справжнісінький/VY
стабільний/VWZ
старанніший/VY
стидати/IJGHQR
стійкий/VWZ
стійкіший/VY
стрункіший/VY
сумірність/lmZ
суперечливіший/VY
схожий/VZ
талановитіший/VY
тепліший/VY
терплячість/lmZ
тихіший/VY
товстіший/VY
топтати/ABGHOP
торгувати/ABGHOP
точніший/VY
традиційний/VWZ
тренувати/ABGHOP
тривожніший/VY
тяжчий/VY
убивати/IJGHQR
узгоджений/VZ
унеможливлювати/ABOP
упертіший/VY
управляти/IJGHQR
урізати/IJQR
уславлювати/ABOP
успішніший/VY
ухиляти/IJGHQR
ушкоджений/VZ
фальсифікувати/ABGHOP
фемінізувати/ABGHOP
фінішувати/ABGHOP
флуоресціювати/AGO
фокусувати/ABOPW
фонтанувати/AGO
формувати/ABGHOP
форсувати/ABGHOP
фрондувати/AGO
функціонувати/AGO
хіхікати/IGQ
холодніший/VY
царювати/ABGHO
цементувати/ABGHOP
церемонний/VWZ
цікавіший/VY
чатувати/AGO
чекати/IJGHQ
чемніший/VY
численніший/VY
чіпати/IJGHQR
членороздільний/VWZ
чоботарювати/AGO
чудовіший/VY
чути/IJGHQ
ширший/VY
шити/IJGHQR
шморгати/IGQ
шокувати/ABGHOP
шпиняти/IGQ
штудіювати/ABGHOP
штурмувати/ABGHOP
щедріший/VY
щирість/lmZ
яскравіший/VY
